nursery/apertium-es-ssp/apertium-es-ssp.ssp.dix
<pardef n="sc:òmemuwy-mepu__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>-by</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   </pardef>

<pardef n="ohsomimuca:oämimul__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>be</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   </pardef>

<pardef n="sumicy:umiwy__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ru</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   </pardef>
<pardef n="olomamuwreihob__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>y</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   </pardef>


    <pardef n="ebáémywu__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ry</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   </pardef>

<pardef n="áémype__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>ru</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   </pardef>




<pardef n="s:òmamudohov__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>b</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
   </pardef>

  <pardef n="s:aeimedaho__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>by</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
</pardef>


<pardef n="aboämèmului__n">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>re</l> 
        <r><s n="n"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
</pardef>



    
    <pardef n="100__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="yiāgro__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>


<pardef n="omemuwreiho__adv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adv"/><s n="itg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>


<pardef n="chomaq__advtmppr">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="eimemufaheb__advtmp">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="hm.õamamacoac__advtmpps">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="y.òmimygrec__advtmpft">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="chòãmizldu-ch.ômic__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="sòamemaca:ömemuzo__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l>ru</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>


  <pardef n="y.òamicb__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
     <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

<pardef n="eämemapib__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="pl"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="itg"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/></r>
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ye__prn">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="prn"/><s n="tn"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

    <pardef n="6__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>6</l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="62__num">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="num"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

 <pardef n="y.òamicb__pos">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="det"/><s n="pos"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>



  
   
    <pardef n="sòamémaha:òacrouzp__vbser">
      <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="vbser"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="vbser"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="vbser"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="vbser"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
    

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="X__adj">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>X</l> 
        <r><s n="adj"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="sòamémaha:omeli__predet">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="predet"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>
    <pardef n="ch.óacb__cnjadv">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l></l> 
        <r><s n="cnjadv"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>

    </pardef>

<pardef n="/sòmimucu:òmeze__vblex">
    <e>
      <p>
        <l>sòmimucu:òmeze</l> 
        <r>sòmimucu:òmeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
  <e>
      <p>
        <l>sòmimucu:òmeze</l> 
        <r>sòmimucu:òmeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>sòmimucu:òmeze</l> 
        <r>sòmimucu:òmeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>sòmimucu:òmeze</l> 
        <r>sòmimucu:òmeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>sòmimucu:òmeze</l> 
        <r>sòmimucu:òmeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e> 
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>sòmimucu:òmeze</l> 
        <r>sòmimucu:òmeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>  
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>sòmimucu:òmeze</l> 
        <r>sòmimucu:òmeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
    <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>sòmimucu:òmeze</l> 
        <r>sòmimucu:òmeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>ebòamymafaho</l> 
        <r>sòmimucu:òmeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>   
 <e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>elòamàmafahob</l> 
        <r>sòmimucu:òmeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="sg"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
<e r="RL">
      <p>
        <l>elòamàmafahob</l> 
        <r>sòmimucu:òmeze<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s  n="pl"/></r> 
      </p>
    </e>
    </pardef>

<e lm="sòamémaha:omeli"><i>sòamémaha:omeli</i><par n="sòamémaha:omeli__predet"/></e>
<e lm="elememuwraho"><i>elememuwraho</i><par n="ye__prn"/></e>
<e lm="eyle"><i>eyle</i><par n="ye__prn"/></e>
<e lm="olememuwraho y.òamicb"><i>olememuwraho<b/>y.òamicb</i><par n="y.òamicb__pos"/></e>
<e lm="olemumawraho y.òamicb"><i>olemumawraho<b/>y.òamicb</i><par n="y.òamicb__pos"/></e>
<e lm="oämamals"><i>oämamals</i><par n="eämemapib__prn"/></e>
<e lm="eämemapib"><i>eämemapib</i><par n="eämemapib__prn"/></e>
<e lm="s:òamèmadohe"><i>s:òamèmadohe</i><par n="eämemapib__prn"/></e>
<e lm="se"><i>se</i><par n="ye__prn"/></e>
<e lm="y.òamicb eyle"><i>y.òamicb<b/>eyle</i><par n="y.òamicb__pos"/></e>
<e lm="aboämèmului"><i>aboämèmului</i><par n="aboämèmului__n"/></e>
<e lm="abáémywu svc:omèq"><i>abáémywu</i><par n="s:aeimedaho__n"/><p><l><b/>svc:omèq</l><r><g><b/>svc:omèq</g></r></p></e>
<e lm="ahsòmémuho:ômamuc"><i>ahsòmémuho:ômamuc</i><par n="ebáémywu__n"/></e>
<e lm="alsemimucy:emamusu"><i>alsemimucy:emamusu</i><par n="s:òmamudohov__n"/></e>
<e lm="ch.òãmamuldre"><i>ch.òãmamuldre</i><par n="s:òmamudohov__n"/></e>
<e lm="kòã sha:òmemupo"><i>kòã<b/>sha:òmemupo</i><par n="s:aeimedaho__n"/></e>
<e lm="sòamico:òamidoho"><i>sòamico:òamidoho</i><par n="s:òmamudohov__n"/></e>
<e lm="ohsomimuca:oämimul"><i>ohsomimuca:oämimul</i><par n="ohsomimuca:oämimul__n"/></e>
<e lm="ebáémywu"><i>ebáémywu</i><par n="ebáémywu__n"/></e>
<e lm="olomamuwreihob"><i>olomamuwreihob</i><par n="olomamuwreihob__n"/></e>
<e lm="s:aloämèmului"><i>s:aloämèmului</i><par n="ohsomimuca:oämimul__n"/></e>
<e lm="s:aememupu"><i>s:aememupu</i><par n="s:aeimedaho__n"/></e>
<e lm="sumicy:umiwy"><i>sumicy:umiwy</i><par n="sumicy:umiwy__n"/></e>
<e lm="sòamico:òamamaza"><i>sòamico:òamamaza</i><par n="ebáémywu__n"/></e>
<e lm="sõámiha:õámila"><i>sõámiha:õámila</i><par n="s:aeimedaho__n"/></e>
<e lm="vm.eämigro"><i>vm.eämigro</i><par n="s:òmamudohov__n"/></e>
<e lm="áémype"><i>áémype</i><par n="áémype__n"/></e>
<e lm="alómamupe"><i>alómamupe</i><par n="ebáémywu__n"/></e>
<e lm="ömemawo"><i>ömemawo</i><par n="áémype__n"/></e>
<e lm="ch.ömawraiheb"><i>ch.ömawraiheb</i><par n="chòãmizldu-ch.ômic__adj"/></e>
<e lm="sòamemaca:ömemuzo"><i>sòamemaca:ömemuzo</i><par n="sòamemaca:ömemuzo__adj"/></e>
<e lm="alumamawu"><i>alumamawu</i><par n="chòãmizldu-ch.ômic__adj"/></e>
<e lm="X"><i>X</i><par n="X__adj"/></e>
<e lm="y.òamicb olemumawraho"><i>y.òamicb<b/>olemumawraho</i><par n="y.òamicb__adj"/></e>
<e lm="s:ymogrue"><i>s:ymogrue</i><par n="chòãmizldu-ch.ômic__adj"/></e>
<e lm="y.òamicb"><i>y.òamicb</i><par n="y.òamicb__adj"/></e>
<e lm="y.òamicb eyle"><i>y.òamicb<b/>eyle</i><par n="y.òamicb__adj"/></e>
<e lm="de manera que"><i>de<b/>manera<b/>que</i><par n="ch.óacb__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="s:ebòamemacya"><i>s:ebòamemacya</i><par n="ch.óacb__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="sòamacy:õmazpu ch.óacb"><i>sòamacy:õmazpu<b/>ch.óacb</i><par n="ch.óacb__cnjadv"/></e>
<e lm="sòamémaha:òacrouzp"><i>sòamémaha:òacrouzp</i><par n="sòamémaha:òacrouzp__vbser"/></e>
<e lm="abáémywu abeämipub"><i>abáémywu<b/>abeämipub</i><par n="sòamémaha:òacrouzp__vbser"/></e>
<e lm="sv:òamamudohe"><i>sv:òamamudohe</i><par n="sòamémaha:òacrouzp__vbser"/></e>
<e lm="sòmimucu:òmeze"><par n="/sòmimucu:òmeze__vblex"/></e>
<e lm="ch.émacb"><i>ch.émacb</i><par n="omemuwreiho__adv"/></e>
<e lm="schomaze"><i>schomaze</i><par n="omemuwreiho__adv"/></e>
<e lm="olemumawu"><i>olemumawu</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hm.òmamafahocb"><i>hm.òmamafahocb</i><par n="hm.õamamacoac__advtmpps"/></e>
<e lm="hm.òamifehob"><i>hm.òamifehob</i><par n="hm.õamamacoac__advtmpps"/></e>
<e lm="ebemicea"><i>ebemicea</i><par n="y.òmimygrec__advtmpft"/></e>
<e lm="hm.õamewe"><i>hm.õamewe</i><par n="y.òmimygrec__advtmpft"/></e>
<e lm="eimemufaheb"><i>eimemufaheb</i><par n="eimemufaheb__advtmp"/></e>
<e lm="hm.òamamafahecb"><i>hm.òamamafahecb</i><par n="omemuwreiho__adv"/></e>
<e lm="hm.õamamacoac"><i>hm.õamamacoac</i><par n="hm.õamamacoac__advtmpps"/></e>
<e lm="olemumapu"><i>olemumapu</i><par n="chomaq__advtmppr"/></e>
<e lm="olõamawu"><i>olõamawu</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="s:òamemapub"><i>s:òamemapub</i><par n="chomaq__advtmppr"/></e>
<e lm="s:òamemuwraihob"><i>s:òamemuwraihob</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sFmaha:Fmàcya"><i>sFmaha:Fmàcya</i><par n="eimemufaheb__advtmp"/></e>
<e lm="sl:emamawab"><i>sl:emamawab</i><par n="eimemufaheb__advtmp"/></e>
<e lm="sòamiho:ömec"><i>sòamiho:ömec</i><par n="yiāgro__adv"/></e>
<e lm="sòamémaha:òawrahec chomaq"><i>sòamémaha:òawrahec<b/>chomaq</i><par n="chomaq__advtmppr"/></e>
<e lm="y.òmimygrec"><i>y.òmimygrec</i><par n="y.òmimygrec__advtmpft"/></e>
<e lm="õamewe"><i>õamewe</i><par n="omemuwreiho__adv"/></e>
